Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-345.01
Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, defined.

Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle means any motor vehicle which:

(1) Uses batteries to power an electric motor;

(2) Uses motor vehicle fuel as defined in section 66-482, diesel fuel as defined in section 66-482, or compressed fuel as defined in section 66-6,100 to power an internal combustion engine; and

(3) Has batteries that can be charged using a wall outlet or charging equipment.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 61.